California, session 20252026, AB738.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 25402.18 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:25402.18. (a) Notwithstanding other law, residential construction intended to repair, restore, or replace a residential building damaged or destroyed as a result of a disaster in an area in which a state of emergency has been proclaimed by the Governor pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 8550) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall comply with requirements regarding photovoltaic systems pursuant to regulations prescribed pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 25402, if any, that were in effect at the time the damaged or destroyed residential building was originally constructed and shall not be required to comply with any additional or conflicting photovoltaic system requirements in effect at the time of repair, restoration, or replacement.(b) This section only applies when all of the following conditions are met:(1) The income of the owner of the residential building is at or below the median income for the county in which the residential building is located as determined by the Department of Housing and Community Development state income limits.(2) The square footage of the residential building after the new construction will not exceed the square footage of the residential building at the time it was damaged or destroyed.(3) The new construction is located on the site of the residential building that was damaged or destroyed.(4) The owner of the residential building did not have code upgrade insurance at the time the residential building was damaged or destroyed.(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code.